District of Columbia statutes.
24-904

Conditional release; unconditional discharge.

(a)

A committed youth offender may be released conditionally under supervision whenever appropriate.

(b)

A committed youth offender may be unconditionally discharged at the end of 1 year from the date of conditional release.

(c)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to a youth offender convicted of any offense committed on or after August 5, 2000.

Dec. 7, 1985, D.C. Law 6-69, § 5, 32 DCR 4587
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-302, § 9(c), 47 DCR 7249
This section is referenced in § 16-2320 and § 24-903.
1981 Ed., § 24-804.
D.C. Law 13-302 added subsec. (c).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 9(c) of the Sentencing Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-410, August 11, 2000, 47 DCR 7271).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(c) of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-462, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(c) of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(c) of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).